Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska66-698
Purpose of act.

The purpose of the Compressed Fuel Tax Act is to supplement the provisions of the tax upon motor fuels by imposing a tax upon all compressed fuel sold or distributed for use in motor vehicles registered or required to be registered for operation upon the highways of this state.

Laws 1995, LB 182, § 2;

Laws 2000, LB 1067, § 23;

Laws 2004, LB 983, § 38.